Hawaii statutes.
§145-13 Remedies and penalties not
exclusive. The penalties and remedies provided in this chapter with
respect to any violation of this chapter shall not be deemed exclusive of each
other or of any other civil or criminal rights, remedies, or penalties provided
or allowed by law with respect to any such violation. [L 1951, c 74, pt of §1;
RL 1955, §23-13; HRS §145-13]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next